Hawaii statutes.
§601-3.7 Judiciary computer system special
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury a special fund to be
known as the judiciary computer system special fund, which shall contain the
following:

(1) Moneys collected from administrative fees pursuant
to section 287-3(a);

(2) Fees prescribed by the supreme court by rule of
court for electronic document certification, electronic copies of documents,
and for providing bulk access to electronic court records and compilations of
data; and

(3) Fees pursuant to sections 607-4(b)(10) and 607‑5(c)(32).

(b) The fund shall be used for:

(1) Consulting and other related fees and expenses in
the selection, implementation, programming, and subsequent upgrades in
judiciary computer system for a statewide computer system; and

(2) The purchase of hardware and related software for
a judiciary computer system.

(c) The fund may be used for other expenses
relating to new technology in traffic enforcement and civil, criminal, and
appellate case processing and management, including operations and maintenance.

(d) Moneys in the judiciary computer system
special fund shall not revert to the general fund. [L 1996, c 203, §§2, 9; am L
1999, c 299, §1; am L 2003, c 216, §1; am L 2004, c 230, §§2, 6 and c 231, §1;
am L 2006, c 21, §1; am L 2011, c 60, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next